Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-616
Nomination for general
election; other methods.

(1) Any registered voter
who was not a candidate in the primary election and who was not registered
to vote with a party affiliation on or after March 1 and before the general election in the calendar
year of the general election may have his or her name placed on the general
election ballot for a partisan office by filing petitions as prescribed in
sections 32-617 to 32-621 or by nomination by political party convention or
committee pursuant to section 32-627 or 32-710.

(2) Any candidate who was defeated in the primary election
and any registered voter who was not a candidate in the primary election may
have his or her name placed on the general election ballot if a vacancy exists
on the ballot under subsection (2) of section 32-625 and the candidate files
for the office by petition as prescribed in sections 32-617 and 32-618, files
as a write-in candidate as prescribed in section 32-615, or is nominated by
political party convention or committee pursuant to section 32-627 or 32-710.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 184;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 61;

Laws 2002, LB 251, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB368, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB449, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 13.